output/dictionaries/Medzuslovjansky_LatinicaEtimologicna.aff
FLAG long
SFX FJ Y 78
SFX FJ idti šėl .
SFX FJ idti šla .
SFX FJ idti šlo .
SFX FJ idti šli .
SFX FJ ti ų .
SFX FJ ti em .
SFX FJ ti eš .
SFX FJ ti e .
SFX FJ ti emȯ .
SFX FJ ti ete .
SFX FJ ti ųt .
SFX FJ ti eh .
SFX FJ ti eše .
SFX FJ ti ehmȯ .
SFX FJ ti este .
SFX FJ ti ehų .
SFX FJ ti i .
SFX FJ ti imȯ .
SFX FJ ti ite .
SFX FJ ti ųći .
SFX FJ ti ųćego .
SFX FJ ti ųćemu .
SFX FJ ti ųćim .
SFX FJ ti ųćem .
SFX FJ ti ųćih .
SFX FJ ti ųćimi .
SFX FJ ti ųća .
SFX FJ ti ųće .
SFX FJ ti omy .
SFX FJ ti omogo .
SFX FJ ti omomu .
SFX FJ ti omym .
SFX FJ ti omom .
SFX FJ ti omo .
SFX FJ ti oma .
SFX FJ ti omų .
SFX FJ ti omoj .
SFX FJ ti omojų .
SFX FJ ti omi .
SFX FJ ti ome .
SFX FJ ti omyh .
SFX FJ ti omym .
SFX FJ ti omymi .
SFX FJ ti omo .
SFX FJ idti šėvši .
SFX FJ idti šėvšego .
SFX FJ idti šėvšemu .
SFX FJ idti šėvšim .
SFX FJ idti šėvšem .
SFX FJ idti šėvših .
SFX FJ idti šėvšimi .
SFX FJ idti šėvša .
SFX FJ idti šėvšų .
SFX FJ idti šėvšej .
SFX FJ idti šėvšejų .
SFX FJ idti šėvše .
SFX FJ ti eny .
SFX FJ ti enogo .
SFX FJ ti enomu .
SFX FJ ti enym .
SFX FJ ti enom .
SFX FJ ti eni .
SFX FJ ti ene .
SFX FJ ti enyh .
SFX FJ ti enymi .
SFX FJ ti ena .
SFX FJ ti enų .
SFX FJ ti enoj .
SFX FJ ti enojų .
SFX FJ ti eno .
SFX FJ ti eńje/xPxE .
SFX FJ ti eńja/xPxE .
SFX FJ ti eńju/xPxE .
SFX FJ ti eńjem/xPxE .
SFX FJ ti enij/xPxE .
SFX FJ ti eńjam/xPxE .
SFX FJ ti eńjami/xPxE .
SFX FJ ti eńjah/xPxE .

SFX FK Y 15
SFX FK 0 0/xPxE .
SFX FK 0 e/xPxBxO .
SFX FK ȯž ž/xPxE .
SFX FK ȯž ži/xPxE .
SFX FK 0 i/xPxE .
SFX FK ȯž žij/xPxE .
SFX FK 0 ij/xPxE .
SFX FK ȯž žah/xPxE .
SFX FK 0 ah/xPxE .
SFX FK ȯž žam/xPxE .
SFX FK 0 am/xPxE .
SFX FK ȯž žjų/xPxE .
SFX FK 0 jų/xPxE .
SFX FK ȯž žami/xPxE .
SFX FK 0 ami/xPxE .

SFX FL Y 3
SFX FL o yh .
SFX FL o ym .
SFX FL o ymi .

SFX FM Y 8
SFX FM a y .
SFX FM a ų .
SFX FM ka ȯk .
SFX FM a ě .
SFX FM 0 h .
SFX FM 0 m .
SFX FM a ojų .
SFX FM 0 mi .

SFX FN Y 6
SFX FN 0 0/xPxE .
SFX FN y o/xPxBxO .
SFX FN ky ȯk/xPxE .
SFX FN y ah/xPxE .
SFX FN y am/xPxE .
SFX FN y ami/xPxE .

SFX FO Y 6
SFX FO 0 0/xPxE .
SFX FO a ų/xPxE .
SFX FO a y/xPxE .
SFX FO a ě/xPxE .
SFX FO a ojų/xPxE .
SFX FO a o/xPxE .

SFX FP Y 78
SFX FP ti l .
SFX FP ti la .
SFX FP ti lo .
SFX FP ti li .
SFX FP råzkazati skažų .
SFX FP råzkazati skažem .
SFX FP råzkazati skažeš .
SFX FP råzkazati skaže .
SFX FP råzkazati skažemȯ .
SFX FP råzkazati skažete .
SFX FP råzkazati skažųt .
SFX FP ti h .
SFX FP ti še .
SFX FP ti hmȯ .
SFX FP ti ste .
SFX FP ti hų .
SFX FP råzkazati skaži .
SFX FP råzkazati skažimȯ .
SFX FP råzkazati skažite .
SFX FP råzkazati skažųći .
SFX FP råzkazati skažųćego .
SFX FP råzkazati skažųćemu .
SFX FP råzkazati skažųćim .
SFX FP råzkazati skažųćem .
SFX FP råzkazati skažųćih .
SFX FP råzkazati skažųćimi .
SFX FP råzkazati skažųća .
SFX FP råzkazati skažųće .
SFX FP råzkazati skažemy .
SFX FP råzkazati skažemogo .
SFX FP råzkazati skažemomu .
SFX FP råzkazati skažemym .
SFX FP råzkazati skažemom .
SFX FP råzkazati skažemo .
SFX FP råzkazati skažema .
SFX FP råzkazati skažemų .
SFX FP råzkazati skažemoj .
SFX FP råzkazati skažemojų .
SFX FP råzkazati skažemi .
SFX FP råzkazati skažeme .
SFX FP råzkazati skažemyh .
SFX FP råzkazati skažemym .
SFX FP råzkazati skažemymi .
SFX FP råzkazati skažemo .
SFX FP ti vši .
SFX FP ti všego .
SFX FP ti všemu .
SFX FP ti všim .
SFX FP ti všem .
SFX FP ti vših .
SFX FP ti všimi .
SFX FP ti vša .
SFX FP ti všų .
SFX FP ti všej .
SFX FP ti všejų .
SFX FP ti vše .
SFX FP ti ny .
SFX FP ti nogo .
SFX FP ti nomu .
SFX FP ti nym .
SFX FP ti nom .
SFX FP ti ni .
SFX FP ti ne .
SFX FP ti nyh .
SFX FP ti nymi .
SFX FP ti na .
SFX FP ti nų .
SFX FP ti noj .
SFX FP ti nojų .
SFX FP ti no .
SFX FP ti ńje/xPxE .
SFX FP ti ńja/xPxE .
SFX FP ti ńju/xPxE .
SFX FP ti ńjem/xPxE .
SFX FP ti nij/xPxE .
SFX FP ti ńjam/xPxE .
SFX FP ti ńjami/xPxE .
SFX FP ti ńjah/xPxE .

SFX FQ Y 60
SFX FQ ti l .
SFX FQ ti la .
SFX FQ ti lo .
SFX FQ ti li .
SFX FQ ti nų .
SFX FQ ti nem .
SFX FQ ti neš .
SFX FQ ti ne .
SFX FQ ti nemȯ .
SFX FQ ti nete .
SFX FQ ti nųt .
SFX FQ ti h .
SFX FQ ti še .
SFX FQ ti hmȯ .
SFX FQ ti ste .
SFX FQ ti hų .
SFX FQ ti ni .
SFX FQ ti nimȯ .
SFX FQ ti nite .
SFX FQ ti nųći .
SFX FQ ti nųćego .
SFX FQ ti nųćemu .
SFX FQ ti nųćim .
SFX FQ ti nųćem .
SFX FQ ti nųćih .
SFX FQ ti nųćimi .
SFX FQ ti nųća .
SFX FQ ti nųće .
SFX FQ ti nemy .
SFX FQ ti nemogo .
SFX FQ ti nemomu .
SFX FQ ti nemym .
SFX FQ ti nemom .
SFX FQ ti nemo .
SFX FQ ti nema .
SFX FQ ti nemų .
SFX FQ ti nemoj .
SFX FQ ti nemojų .
SFX FQ ti nemi .
SFX FQ ti neme .
SFX FQ ti nemyh .
SFX FQ ti nemym .
SFX FQ ti nemymi .
SFX FQ ti nemo .
SFX FQ ti vši .
SFX FQ ti všego .
SFX FQ ti všemu .
SFX FQ ti všim .
SFX FQ ti všem .
SFX FQ ti vših .
SFX FQ ti všimi .
SFX FQ ti vša .
SFX FQ ti všų .
SFX FQ ti všej .
SFX FQ ti všejų .
SFX FQ ti vše .
SFX FQ i y .
SFX FQ i a .
SFX FQ i o .
SFX FQ ti ťje .

SFX FR Y 28
SFX FR 0 0/xPxE .
SFX FR y o/xBxPxE .
SFX FR y a/xPxE .
SFX FR y ogo/xPxE .
SFX FR y ų/xPxE .
SFX FR y oj/xPxE .
SFX FR y om/xPxE .
SFX FR y omu/xPxE .
SFX FR 0 m/xPxE .
SFX FR y ojų/xPxE .
SFX FR y i/xPxE .
SFX FR y e/xPxE .
SFX FR 0 h/xPxE .
SFX FR 0 mi/xPxE .
SFX FR mnogy boľši/zz .
SFX FR mnogy boľšego/zz .
SFX FR mnogy boľšemu/zz .
SFX FR mnogy boľšim/zz .
SFX FR mnogy boľšem/zz .
SFX FR mnogy boľše/zz .
SFX FR mnogy boľša/zz .
SFX FR mnogy boľšų/zz .
SFX FR mnogy boľšej/zz .
SFX FR mnogy boľšejų/zz .
SFX FR mnogy boľših/zz .
SFX FR mnogy boľšim/zz .
SFX FR mnogy boľšimi/zz .
SFX FR mnogy bolje/zz .

SFX FS Y 9
SFX FS 0 0/xPxE .
SFX FS i o/xPxBxO .
SFX FS i eri/xPxE .
SFX FS i ere/xPxE .
SFX FS i erij/xPxE .
SFX FS i erah/xPxE .
SFX FS i eram/xPxE .
SFX FS i erjų/xPxE .
SFX FS i erami/xPxE .

SFX FT Y 8
SFX FT 0 0/xPxE .
SFX FT 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX FT 0 i/xPxE .
SFX FT 0 ij/xPxE .
SFX FT 0 ah/xPxE .
SFX FT 0 am/xPxE .
SFX FT 0 jų/xPxE .
SFX FT 0 ami/xPxE .

SFX FU Y 28
SFX FU 0 0/xPxE .
SFX FU y o/xBxPxE .
SFX FU y a/xPxE .
SFX FU y ogo/xPxE .
SFX FU y ų/xPxE .
SFX FU y oj/xPxE .
SFX FU y om/xPxE .
SFX FU y omu/xPxE .
SFX FU 0 m/xPxE .
SFX FU y ojų/xPxE .
SFX FU y i/xPxE .
SFX FU y e/xPxE .
SFX FU 0 h/xPxE .
SFX FU 0 mi/xPxE .
SFX FU gky žši/zz .
SFX FU gky žšego/zz .
SFX FU gky žšemu/zz .
SFX FU gky žšim/zz .
SFX FU gky žšem/zz .
SFX FU gky žše/zz .
SFX FU gky žša/zz .
SFX FU gky žšų/zz .
SFX FU gky žšej/zz .
SFX FU gky žšejų/zz .
SFX FU gky žših/zz .
SFX FU gky žšim/zz .
SFX FU gky žšimi/zz .
SFX FU ky še/xPxE .

SFX FV Y 68
SFX FV sti dl .
SFX FV sti dla .
SFX FV sti dlo .
SFX FV sti dli .
SFX FV sti m .
SFX FV sti š .
SFX FV sti 0 .
SFX FV sti mȯ .
SFX FV sti te .
SFX FV sti dųt .
SFX FV sti deh .
SFX FV sti deše .
SFX FV sti dehmȯ .
SFX FV sti deste .
SFX FV sti dehų .
SFX FV sti ď .
SFX FV sti ďmȯ .
SFX FV sti ďte .
SFX FV sti dųći .
SFX FV sti dųćego .
SFX FV sti dųćemu .
SFX FV sti dųćim .
SFX FV sti dųćem .
SFX FV sti dųćih .
SFX FV sti dųćimi .
SFX FV sti dųća .
SFX FV sti dųće .
SFX FV sti domy .
SFX FV sti domogo .
SFX FV sti domomu .
SFX FV sti domym .
SFX FV sti domom .
SFX FV sti domo .
SFX FV sti doma .
SFX FV sti domų .
SFX FV sti domoj .
SFX FV sti domojų .
SFX FV sti domi .
SFX FV sti dome .
SFX FV sti domyh .
SFX FV sti domym .
SFX FV sti domymi .
SFX FV sti domo .
SFX FV sti dši .
SFX FV sti dša .
SFX FV sti dše .
SFX FV sti deny .
SFX FV sti denogo .
SFX FV sti denomu .
SFX FV sti denym .
SFX FV sti denom .
SFX FV sti deni .
SFX FV sti dene .
SFX FV sti denyh .
SFX FV sti denymi .
SFX FV sti dena .
SFX FV sti denų .
SFX FV sti denoj .
SFX FV sti denojų .
SFX FV sti deno .
SFX FV sti deńje/xPxE .
SFX FV sti deńja/xPxE .
SFX FV sti deńju/xPxE .
SFX FV sti deńjem/xPxE .
SFX FV sti denij/xPxE .
SFX FV sti deńjam/xPxE .
SFX FV sti deńjami/xPxE .
SFX FV sti deńjah/xPxE .

SFX FW Y 12
SFX FW koli ekoli .
SFX FW koli akoli .
SFX FW koli egokoli .
SFX FW koli ųkoli .
SFX FW koli ejkoli .
SFX FW koli emkoli .
SFX FW koli emukoli .
SFX FW koli imkoli .
SFX FW koli ejųkoli .
SFX FW koli ikoli .
SFX FW koli ihkoli .
SFX FW koli imikoli .

SFX FX Y 4
SFX FX tokoli egokoli .
SFX FX tokoli emkoli .
SFX FX tokoli emukoli .
SFX FX tokoli imkoli .

SFX FY Y 13
SFX FY ykoli okoli .
SFX FY ykoli akoli .
SFX FY ykoli ogokoli .
SFX FY ykoli ųkoli .
SFX FY ykoli ojkoli .
SFX FY ykoli omkoli .
SFX FY ykoli omukoli .
SFX FY koli mkoli .
SFX FY ykoli ojųkoli .
SFX FY ykoli ikoli .
SFX FY ykoli ekoli .
SFX FY koli hkoli .
SFX FY koli mikoli .

SFX FZ Y 3
SFX FZ e a .
SFX FZ e u .
SFX FZ 0 m .

SFX Fa Y 3
SFX Fa o a .
SFX Fa o u .
SFX Fa 0 m .

SFX Fb Y 12
SFX Fb jže že .
SFX Fb ojže aže .
SFX Fb jže gože .
SFX Fb ojže ųže .
SFX Fb jže mže .
SFX Fb jže muže .
SFX Fb ojže ymže .
SFX Fb že ųže .
SFX Fb ojže iže .
SFX Fb ojže eže .
SFX Fb ojže yhže .
SFX Fb ojže ymiže .

SFX Fc Y 11
SFX Fc 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Fc u o/xPxBxO .
SFX Fc 0 i/xPxE .
SFX Fc 0 a/xPxE .
SFX Fc 0 ov/xPxE .
SFX Fc 0 u/xPxE .
SFX Fc 0 ah/xPxE .
SFX Fc 0 am/xPxE .
SFX Fc 0 om/xPxE .
SFX Fc 0 ami/xPxE .
SFX Fc 0 e/xPxE .

SFX Fd Y 6
SFX Fd 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Fd a o/xPxBxO .
SFX Fd ka ȯk/xPxE .
SFX Fd 0 h/xPxE .
SFX Fd 0 m/xPxE .
SFX Fd 0 mi/xPxE .

SFX Fe Y 10
SFX Fe 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Fe 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX Fe v ȯv/xPxE .
SFX Fe 0 i/xPxE .
SFX Fe 0 e/xPxE .
SFX Fe 0 ij/xPxE .
SFX Fe 0 ah/xPxE .
SFX Fe 0 am/xPxE .
SFX Fe v ȯvjų/xPxE .
SFX Fe 0 ami/xPxE .

SFX Ff Y 10
SFX Ff 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Ff a y/xPxE .
SFX Ff a ų/xPxE .
SFX Ff a 0 .
SFX Ff a ě/xPxE .
SFX Ff 0 h/xPxE .
SFX Ff 0 m/xPxE .
SFX Ff a ojų/xPxE .
SFX Ff 0 mi/xPxE .
SFX Ff a o/xPxE .

SFX Fg Y 4
SFX Fg tokoli ogokoli .
SFX Fg tokoli omkoli .
SFX Fg tokoli omukoli .
SFX Fg tokoli ymkoli .

SFX Fh Y 9
SFX Fh 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Fh a o/xPxBxO .
SFX Fh a e/xPxE .
SFX Fh a o/xPxE .
SFX Fh a oj/xPxE .
SFX Fh a yh/xPxE .
SFX Fh a ym/xPxE .
SFX Fh a ojų/xPxE .
SFX Fh a ymi/xPxE .

SFX Fi Y 69
SFX Fi ti l .
SFX Fi ti la .
SFX Fi ti lo .
SFX Fi ti li .
SFX Fi etěti ěćų .
SFX Fi etěti ětim .
SFX Fi etěti ětiš .
SFX Fi etěti ěti .
SFX Fi etěti ětimȯ .
SFX Fi etěti ětite .
SFX Fi etěti ětęt .
SFX Fi ti h .
SFX Fi ti še .
SFX Fi ti hmȯ .
SFX Fi ti ste .
SFX Fi ti hų .
SFX Fi etěti ětęći .
SFX Fi etěti ětęća .
SFX Fi etěti ětęće .
SFX Fi etěti ětimy .
SFX Fi etěti ětimogo .
SFX Fi etěti ětimomu .
SFX Fi etěti ětimym .
SFX Fi etěti ětimom .
SFX Fi etěti ětimo .
SFX Fi etěti ětima .
SFX Fi etěti ětimų .
SFX Fi etěti ětimoj .
SFX Fi etěti ětimojų .
SFX Fi etěti ětimi .
SFX Fi etěti ětime .
SFX Fi etěti ětimyh .
SFX Fi etěti ětimym .
SFX Fi etěti ětimymi .
SFX Fi etěti ětimo .
SFX Fi ti vši .
SFX Fi ti všego .
SFX Fi ti všemu .
SFX Fi ti všim .
SFX Fi ti všem .
SFX Fi ti vših .
SFX Fi ti všimi .
SFX Fi ti vša .
SFX Fi ti všų .
SFX Fi ti všej .
SFX Fi ti všejų .
SFX Fi ti vše .
SFX Fi ti ny .
SFX Fi ti nogo .
SFX Fi ti nomu .
SFX Fi ti nym .
SFX Fi ti nom .
SFX Fi ti ni .
SFX Fi ti ne .
SFX Fi ti nyh .
SFX Fi ti nymi .
SFX Fi ti na .
SFX Fi ti nų .
SFX Fi ti noj .
SFX Fi ti nojų .
SFX Fi ti no .
SFX Fi ti ńje/xPxE .
SFX Fi ti ńja/xPxE .
SFX Fi ti ńju/xPxE .
SFX Fi ti ńjem/xPxE .
SFX Fi ti nij/xPxE .
SFX Fi ti ńjam/xPxE .
SFX Fi ti ńjami/xPxE .
SFX Fi ti ńjah/xPxE .
